Tennessee, session 114, SB0922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of health shall conduct a study on creating new or
streamlining existing pathways to careers as primary care providers for individuals who have
medical training as noncommissioned officers in the armed forces of the United States. The
study must include identifying potential administrative barriers in current law or rule; identifying
educational requirements for licensure in this state for which military medical training is
equivalent to existing, creditable training; recommendations for creating career pathways for
military-trained medical professionals to enter the field of primary care in this state as
physicians, nurses, physician assistants, and other primary care providers; methods for
recruiting armed forces veterans with medical training to enter the primary care provider
workforce of this state; and such other subjects the commissioner may identify and deem
relevant to the study. The commissioner shall conduct the study using existing departmental
resources. The commissioner must deliver the commissioner's findings and any
recommendations for changes to existing law or rule to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief
clerk of the house of representatives, and the legislative librarian no later than December 31,
2025.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0922
002183
- 1 -